Hawaii statutes.
§428-107 Registered agent. A limited
liability company and a foreign limited liability company authorized to
transact business in this State shall continuously maintain in this State a
registered agent, who shall have a business address in this State and may be:

(1) An individual who resides in this State;

(2) A domestic entity authorized to transact business
in this State; or

(3) A foreign entity authorized to transact business
in this State. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §70; am L 2009, c 55,
§52]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next